South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S938.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This joint resolution may be cited as the "South Carolina Nuclear Innovation Campus Support Joint Resolution." SECTION 2.  For purposes of this joint resolution: (1) "Request for Information" means the solicitation issued January 28, 2026, by the U.S. Department of Energy seeking state partners to host Nuclear Lifecycle Innovation Campuses. (2) "Nuclear Lifecycle Innovation Campus" means an integrated environment supporting one or more elements of nuclear research, development, demonstration, deployment, fuel cycle services, materials management, advanced manufacturing, and workforce development. (3) "State response" means a coordinated submission developed by the State of South Carolina in response to the Request for Information. (4) "V.C. Summer Units 2 and 3" means the partially constructed nuclear reactor units at the V.C. Summer Nuclear Station in Jenkinsville, South Carolina, the restart and completion of which was directed pursuant to Act 73 of 2025. SECTION 3.  The General Assembly finds that South Carolina's nuclear infrastructure, workforce, research institutions, and proven operational record make it uniquely suited to host a Nuclear Lifecycle Innovation Campus, and that doing so would advance national security by reducing dependence on foreign nuclear fuel and services, support defense-related missions and critical infrastructure, reinforce American technological leadership, generate high-wage employment, attract transformative private investment, and strengthen advanced manufacturing throughout the State. The General Assembly further finds that the enactment of Act 73 of 2025, directing Santee Cooper to solicit private sector bids for the completion of V.C. Summer Units 2 and 3, and Santee Cooper's subsequent award of that contract to Brookfield Renewable Partners, reflects South Carolina's demonstrated willingness to act decisively to advance nuclear energy development, and that the active restart and completion of those reactors will provide a singular operational asset - new nuclear construction underway within the state's borders - that no other prospective host state can offer to the federal government in connection with a Nuclear Lifecycle Innovation Campus. The General Assembly further finds that the convening of a public-private steering committee by the South Carolina Department of Commerce reflects the coordinated, collaborative approach this initiative demands, and that the General Assembly's formal expression of support strengthens South Carolina's competitive position before the federal government. SECTION 4.  The General Assembly expresses its support for the development of the strongest possible competitive State response to the U.S. Department of Energy's Request for Information, and affirms South Carolina's readiness, capability, and commitment to serve as a premier host for an integrated Nuclear Lifecycle Innovation Campus or one or more components thereof consistent with federal guidance. The General Assembly further affirms that the restart and completion of V.C. Summer Nuclear Units 2 and 3, undertaken pursuant to Act 73 of 2025, exemplifies the type of bold, forward-looking action that distinguishes South Carolina from other states and that makes this State the preeminent candidate to host a Nuclear Lifecycle Innovation Campus. Nothing in this joint resolution shall be construed as committing the State to a specific site, geographic region, fuel cycle activity, or financial obligation, and any future decisions regarding siting, funding, or formal agreements shall require separate legislative authorization and appropriate oversight. SECTION 5.  Within thirty days after the effective date of this joint resolution, each agency or subdivision of the State to which this joint resolution applies shall receive a copy of this resolution and shall take all necessary actions to ensure full collaboration in furtherance of its purposes. This section does not apply to units of local government. SECTION 6.  The provisions of this joint resolution shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes. SECTION 7.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----